Utah statutes.
75-3-616.   Special administrator -- Appointed informally -- Powers and duties.

A special administrator appointed by the registrar in informal proceedings pursuant to Subsection 75-3-614(1)(a) has the duty to collect and manage the assets of the estate, to preserve them, to account therefor and to deliver them to the general personal representative upon his qualification. The special administrator has the power of a personal representative under the code necessary to perform his duties.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

